Hawaii, session 2025, GM1247.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that many forms of cruel
and degrading sadism are inadequately addressed under existing
criminal law. Some acts occur during aggravated kidnappings or
following repeated assaults. Other acts, such as starvation or
electrocution, may inflict immense suffering without technically
causing bodily injury. The common denominator for torture is
the pervasive physical and psychological control exercised over
the victim by the abuser.
Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to establish the
offense of torture as a class A felony in the State.
SECTION 2. Chapter 707, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended by adding a new section to be appropriately designated
and to read as follows:
"§707- Torture. (1) Any person who knowingly:
(a) Causes serious bodily injury to another person within
the actor's custody or physical control;
2025-2885 SB281 CDl SMA.docx 1
llllllliniHIIHIMHIilNIIIM

Page 2 281
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
Causes serious bodily injury or substantial bodily
injury to another person, and the actor has previously
engaged in a pattern or practice of physically abusing
the other person; or
(c) Subjects a minor or vulnerable person to any of the
following acts, or to any substantially similar act,
on three or more occasions within a period of two
years:
(i) Strangling the minor or vulnerable person;
(ii) Biting, branding, burning, cutting, or
electrocuting the minor or vulnerable person;
(iii) Suspending the minor or vulnerable person by the
wrists, ankles, arms, legs, hair, or other part
of the body;
(iv) Depriving the minor or vulnerable person of
necessary food, water, or clothing;
(v) Restricting basic and necessary bodily functions
required for the personal hygiene of the minor or
vulnerable person;
(vi) Forcing the minor or vulnerable person to remain
in an area unsuitable for human habitation, such
2025-2885 SB281 CDl SMA.docx

Page 3 281
S.B. NO
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
as areas where urine or feces are actively
present;
(vii) Forcing the minor or vulnerable person to ingest
mind-altering drugs that have not been prescribed
by a physician for the minor or vulnerable
person, non-potable water, urine, excrement, or
poison; or
(viii) Exposing the minor or vulnerable person to
extreme temperatures without adequate clothing,
shall be guilty of the offense of torture.
(2) Proof that the victim suffered pain is not an element
of a violation of subsection (1)(c).
(3) For purposes of this section:
"Custody or physical control" means the forcible
restriction of a person's movements or the forcible confinement
of the person so as to interfere with that person's liberty,
without that person's consent or without lawful authority.
"Deprives" or "restricts" means to withhold in a manner
that materially endangers the physical or mental health of a
minor or vulnerable person.
"Minor" means a person under the age of eighteen years.
2025-2885 SB281 CDl SMA.docx 3
HBinaiMIIHIIIIBIIIHi

Page 4 S.B. NO. " 1
C.D. 1
"Pattern or practice” means two or more acts within a
period of two years with a common state of mind.
"Vulnerable person" means a family or household member as
defined in section 709-906, an incompetent person as defined in
S section 709-905, or a person who has a status as described in
section 706-662(5)(b)(ii).
(4) Torture is a class A felony.
(5) Where the conduct consists of depriving the minor or
vulnerable person of necessary food, water, or clothing, it
shall be a defense that the deprivation was caused solely by
poverty, destitution, or lack of financial means."
SECTION 3. This Act does not affect rights and duties that
matured, penalties that were incurred, and proceedings that were
begun before its effective date.
SECTION 4. If any provision of this Act, or the
application thereof to any person or circumstance, is held
invalid, the invalidity does not affect other provisions or
applications of the Act that can be given effect without the
invalid provision or application, and to this end the provisions
of this Act are severable.
SECTION 5. New statutory material is underscored.
2025-2885 SB281 CDl SMA.docx

Page 5 281
S.B. NO.
S.D. 1
H.D. 2
C.D. 1
SECTION 6. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-2885 SB281 CDl SMA.docx 5

281
S.B. NO.
w b
I o
O b
APPROVED this 30th of May ■ 2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAl‘1

S.B. No. 281, S.D. 1, H.D. 2, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAW API
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate


SB No. 281, SD 1,HD 2, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives